Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,138
Procedure for and effect of administrative dissolution.

(a) Upon determining that one or more grounds exist under section 21-19,137 for dissolving a corporation, the Secretary of State shall serve the corporation with written notice of that determination under section 21-1937, and in the case of a public benefit corporation shall notify the Attorney General in writing.

(b) If the corporation does not, within sixty days after service of the notice is perfected under section 21-1937, correct each ground for dissolution or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State that each ground determined by the Secretary of State does not exist, the Secretary of State may administratively dissolve the corporation by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The Secretary of State shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the corporation under section 21-1937 and in the case of a public benefit corporation shall notify the Attorney General in writing.

(c) A corporation administratively dissolved continues its corporate existence but may not carry on any activities except those necessary to wind up and liquidate its affairs under section 21-19,134 and notify its claimants under sections 21-19,135 and 21-19,136.

(d) The administrative dissolution of a corporation does not terminate the authority of its registered agent.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 138.